Arkansas, session 2025, HB1654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 24, Subchapter 14, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-24-1433. Make-A-Wish Foundation of the Mid South.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall create and issue a Make-A-Wish Foundation of the Mid South special
license plate in the manner and subject to the conditions provided for under
this subchapter.
(b) The Make-A-Wish Foundation of the Mid South special license plate
shall be:
*ZRC042*
03/03/2025 3:27:51 PM ZRC042

HB1654
(1) Designed by the Department of Finance and Administration in
consultation with Make-A-Wish Foundation of the Mid South; and
(2) Numbered consecutively.
(c) The procedures concerning costs for issuance under § 27-24-
1404(c)(1)(A) shall apply.
(d) The department shall issue a special license plate under this
section to a motor vehicle owner upon payment of:
(1) The fee required by law for registration of the motor
vehicle;
(2)(A) Thirty dollars ($30.00) to cover the design-use
contribution.
(B) The design-use contribution shall be remitted monthly
to Make-A-Wish Foundation of the Mid South to be used exclusively to promote
and support Make-A-Wish Foundation of the Mid South; and
(3)(A) A handling and administrative fee of ten dollars
($10.00).
(B) The handling and administrative fee of ten dollars
($10.00) shall be:
(i) Deposited into the State Central Services Fund
for the benefit of the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and
Administration; and
(ii) Credited to the division as supplemental and in
addition to all other funds that may be deposited for the benefit of the
division.
(C) The handling and administrative fee shall not be
considered or credited to the division as direct revenue.
(e)(1) A special license plate issued under this section may be
renewed annually or replaced under the procedures set out in § 27-24-1405.
(2) The division shall remit the fees collected under § 27-24-
1405(b)(2) for the renewal of a special license plate issued under this
section on a monthly basis to Make-A-Wish Foundation of the Mid South.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Mid-South Community College education
special license plate.
(a) The Department of Finance and Administration shall not print,
produce, or acquire additional Mid-South Community College education special
03/03/2025 3:27:51 PM ZRC042

HB1654
license plates.
(b) The Mid-South Community College education special license plate:
(1) Shall continue to be available for issuance and renewal
under § 27-24-1005 until the existing supply of Mid-South Community College
education special license plates is exhausted; and
(2) Is deemed to have been repealed for purposes of § 27-24-
111(b)(1)(A).





























03/03/2025 3:27:51 PM ZRC042